Alabama, session 2026rs, SB227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
22 Section 1. Chapter 2A is added to Title 25 of the Code
23 of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
24 CHAPTER 2A. OFFICE OF OCCUPATIONAL AND PROFESSIONAL
25 LICENSING.
26 §25-2A-1
27 For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms
28 have the following meanings:
Page 1

have the following meanings:
SB227 Engrossed
29 (1) BOARD. A board, commission, or other entity
30 established for the primary purpose of licensing and
31 regulating a specific occupation or profession that is subject
32 to oversight and administration by the Office of Occupational
33 and Professional Licensing of the Alabama Department of
34 Workforce.
35 (2) EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR. The individual appointed by the
36 Secretary of Workforce to serve as the executive director of
37 the office.
38 (3) FUND. The Occupational and Professional Licensing
39 Fund created by this chapter.
40 (4) LICENSE. The certificate or license issued to an
41 individual that certifies he or she is qualified to perform a
42 particular occupation or profession. The term includes a
43 certificate of registration, temporary license, or similar
44 formal grant of permission.
45 (5) OFFICE. The Office of Occupational and Professional
46 Licensing within the Alabama Department of Workforce,
47 responsible for the oversight and administration of certain
48 occupational and professional licensing boards.
49 §25-2A-2
50 (a) There is created within the Alabama Department of
51 Workforce the Office of Occupational and Professional
52 Licensing. The mission of the office is to protect the health,
53 safety, and welfare of the public by licensing qualified
54 individuals and entities and enforcing standards of
55 professional conduct for professions and occupations.
56 (b)(1) The Secretary of Workforce shall appoint and
Page 2

(b)(1) The Secretary of Workforce shall appoint and
SB227 Engrossed
57 shall set the qualifications for an executive director and
58 shall appoint deputy directors, as needed, who shall act in
59 the absence of the executive director and who shall perform
60 other functions of the executive director as the executive
61 director may direct. The executive director and deputy
62 directors shall serve in the exempt service. The compensation
63 of the executive director and deputy directors shall be fixed
64 by the Secretary of Workforce, and they shall hold office at
65 the pleasure of the Secretary of Workforce.
66 (2) The executive director may employ additional
67 personnel, including administrative law judges, attorneys, and
68 investigators, as necessary to carry out this chapter and to
69 provide leadership, support, and oversight required for each
70 board to exercise its powers and fulfill its duties. Except as
71 otherwise provided in this chapter, all personnel shall be
72 subject to the state Merit System Act.
73 (c) An individual hired to conduct investigations for
74 the boards shall meet standards established by the executive
75 director.
76 §25-2A-3
77 (a) The executive director, with the approval of the
78 Secretary of Workforce, may enter into and terminate contracts
79 on behalf of the office or any board, subject to the State
80 Procurement Law, Article 5 of Chapter 4 of Title 41, as
81 necessary to implement this chapter.
82 (b) The rights, privileges, entitlements, or duties of
83 parties to contracts, leases, agreements, or other
84 transactions entered into by a board on or before the date a
Page 3

transactions entered into by a board on or before the date a
SB227 Engrossed
85 board becomes subject to this chapter, shall continue to exist
86 and shall not be impaired or diminished by reason of the board
87 being subject to this chapter. After the date a board becomes
88 subject to this chapter, no existing agreement or contract
89 between a board and a third party may be renewed or otherwise
90 amended unless the agreement or contract complies with this
91 chapter.
92 §25-2A-4
93 On the date a board becomes subject to this chapter,
94 all the rights, duties, assets, employees, records,
95 liabilities, property, real or personal, and all other effects
96 existing in the name of each board shall be transferred to,
97 and under the jurisdiction of, the office. By resolution, a
98 board may transfer its rights, duties, assets, employees,
99 records, liabilities, property, or other effects to the office
100 before the date specified by this chapter if approved by the
101 Secretary of Workforce or the executive director.
102 §25-2A-5
103 (a) The Occupational and Professional Licensing Fund is
104 created within the State Treasury. The office shall collect,
105 on behalf of each board, all funds the board is entitled to
106 receive. Collected funds shall be deposited into the fund and
107 shall be used to implement this chapter and perform required
108 board functions. The executive director shall allocate and
109 disburse funds budgeted and allotted pursuant to the Budget
110 Management Act and Article 4 of Chapter 4 of Title 41.
111 (b) For purposes of this section, required board
112 functions include the maintenance of existing board programs
Page 4

functions include the maintenance of existing board programs
SB227 Engrossed
113 that benefit an occupation or profession including, but not
114 limited to, grant, wellness, and training programs, if the
115 executive director determines that maintenance of the program
116 will not require a material increase in any fee collected by
117 the office.
118 §25-2A-6
119 (a) The executive director shall possess all powers
120 necessary and proper to provide administrative support and
121 oversight to each board, including all of the following:
122 (1) To serve as the custodian of all board records.
123 (2) To receive and process all license applications.
124 (3) By rule, to set all administrative fees including,
125 but not limited to application, license, renewal, examination,
126 and wellness program fees and set the dates, times, and
127 locations of license examinations.
128 (4) To schedule the time and place for all hearings.
129 (5) To issue all licenses.
130 (6) To conduct investigations on behalf of each board
131 and issue subpoenas when authorized.
132 (7) To collect all fees, fines, and other monies due
133 each board and deposit all monies collected into the fund.
134 (8) To implement and enforce the rules and
135 administrative decisions of each board.
136 (b) All board orders shall be signed and attested to by
137 the executive director, or his or her designee, in the name of
138 the applicable board, with the seal of that board attached.
139 Any notice or legal process necessary to be served upon a
140 board may be served upon the executive director.
Page 5

board may be served upon the executive director.
SB227 Engrossed
141 (c) Any document, material, or other information in the
142 possession or control of the office that is obtained by or
143 disclosed in the course of an application, examination, or
144 investigation is confidential, privileged, and not subject to
145 subpoena or discovery.
146 §25-2A-7
147 (a) Each board member shall be paid a per diem amount
148 of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day spent attending a
149 board meeting or other official function of the board and
150 shall be reimbursed for travel expenses at the same rate and
151 under the same circumstances as a state employee is paid for
152 each day he or she attends to business of the board. A board
153 member's request for per diem or reimbursement of travel
154 expenses is subject to approval by the executive director.
155 (b) Board meetings and hearings shall be held in the
156 City of Montgomery, at a site determined by the executive
157 director, or at a different site upon request of the chair and
158 approval by the executive director.
159 (c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to alter
160 the requirements of the Open Meetings Act, Chapter 25A, Title
161 36.
162 §25-2A-8
163 (a) The executive director shall adopt rules pursuant
164 to the Alabama Administrative Procedure Act, as necessary,
165 relating to administrative fees and to the administration of
166 examinations of applicants for licensing by each board
167 pursuant to Section 25-2A-6. The rules may provide for the
168 setting of fees, dates, times, and locations of examinations,
Page 6

setting of fees, dates, times, and locations of examinations,
SB227 Engrossed
169 and other similar matters related to the administration of an
170 examination.
171 (b) Nothing in this chapter shall preclude a board from
172 adopting rules to establish examination standards including,
173 but not limited to, criteria, grading procedures, passing
174 score requirements, and other matters pertaining to
175 substantive material included on an examination.
176 (c) A board, by rule, may establish examination
177 standards developed in agreement or in conjunction with a
178 national association of state boards, or other related
179 national association, for the administration of a nationally
180 recognized uniform examination.
181 (d) Rules adopted by a board before the date of
182 transfer to the office, that are under the jurisdiction of the
183 executive director, shall continue in effect until the
184 executive director expressly amends, repeals, or adopts new
185 rules pursuant to the Alabama Administrative Procedure Act.
186 §25-2A-9
187 (a) The executive director, by rule, may establish
188 administrative fees necessary for the operation of a board
189 including, but not limited to, an application fee, original
190 license fee, license renewal fee, inspection fee, permit fee,
191 wellness program fee, and late penalty fee. Each fee shall be
192 reasonable and shall be determined in a manner that the total
193 amount of fees charged by the board shall approximate the
194 total of the direct and indirect costs to the state of the
195 operations of the board. Fees may be refunded as determined by
196 the executive director.
Page 7

the executive director.
SB227 Engrossed
197 (b) The executive director, by rule, shall determine
198 the term, expiration, renewal period, and late penalty dates
199 for each license issued by a board through the office.
200 §25-2A-10
201 (a) The executive director, on behalf of each board,
202 may issue or deny a temporary license to an applicant who
203 otherwise satisfies all of the qualifications and criteria
204 required for the issuance of a license.
205 (1) If a temporary license is issued to an applicant by
206 the executive director, that decision shall be reviewed by the
207 applicable board at the next meeting of the board, during
208 which time the board may decide to grant or deny a full
209 license to the temporary licensee.
210 (2) If the executive director denies issuing a
211 temporary license to an applicant, that decision shall be
212 reviewed by the applicable board at the next meeting of the
213 board, during which time the board may decide to grant or deny
214 a full license to the applicant.
215 (b) The executive director, on behalf of each board,
216 may temporarily renew a license pursuant to criteria
217 established by the board for the renewal of a license. A
218 temporary renewal issued by the executive director shall be
219 reviewed by the applicable board at the next meeting of the
220 board, during which time the board may decide to grant or deny
221 the license renewal.
222 §25-2A-11
223 Each board remains subject to the Alabama
224 Administrative Procedure Act. Any rule adopted, amended, or
Page 8

Administrative Procedure Act. Any rule adopted, amended, or
SB227 Engrossed
225 repealed by a board, as authorized by this chapter, shall be
226 approved by the executive director before certification
227 pursuant to Section 41-22-6. An emergency rule shall be
228 approved before filing pursuant to Section 41-22-5.
229 §25-2A-12
230 (a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
231 invalidate, override, or amend the Military Family Jobs
232 Opportunity Act, Section 31-1-6, or any licensing compact
233 entered into by this state or any board.
234 (b) The provisions of this chapter are cumulative and
235 supplemental and shall be construed in pari materia with other
236 laws relating to the boards placed under the oversight of the
237 office pursuant to this chapter. Those laws or parts of laws
238 in direct conflict or inconsistent with this chapter are
239 superseded to the extent of the conflict or inconsistency.
240 §25-2A-13
241 (a) Each board shall continue to be subject to the
242 Alabama Sunset Law in the same manner and schedule as provided
243 by law.
244 (b) Commencing with the 2030 Regular Session of the
245 Alabama Legislature, and every fourth regular session
246 thereafter, the Secretary of Workforce, through the executive
247 director of the office, shall submit to the cochairs of the
248 Alabama Sunset Committee, a report recommending the
249 continuation, consolidation, or termination of those boards
250 regulated by this chapter.
251 Section 2. Section 41-20-5 of the Code of Alabama 1975,
252 is amended to read as follows:
Page 9

is amended to read as follows:
SB227 Engrossed
253 "§41-20-5
254 (a) Legislative committee review of the enumerated
255 agencies shall begin in the year prior to the scheduled
256 regular legislative session next preceding the date upon which
257 the enumerated agencies are scheduled to terminate pursuant to
258 Section 41-20-3, and shall conclude with a recommendation for
259 continuation, modification, or termination on or before the
260 first legislative day immediately following said the review.
261 (b) A recommendation for modification may include the
262 transfer of oversight and administration of an enumerated or
263 nonenumerated agency to the Office of Occupational and
264 Professional Licensing of the Alabama Department of Workforce.
265 Before a recommendation for transfer to the office is
266 submitted to the Legislature, the Sunset Committee shall: (i)
267 provide written notice of any issues to the enumerated or
268 nonenumerated agency; and (ii) provide an additional 60
269 calendar days for the agency to correct those issues after
270 notice is received."
271 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
272 1, 2026.
Page 10

1, 2026.
SB227 Engrossed
273
274
275 Senate
276 Read for the first time and referred ................29-Jan-26
277 to the Senate committee on County
278 and Municipal Government
279
280 Read for the second time and placed ................05-Feb-26
281 on the calendar:
282 0 amendments
283
284 Read for the third time and passed ................24-Feb-26
285 as amended
286 Yeas 28
287 Nays 4
288 Abstains 0
289
290
291 Patrick Harris,
292 Secretary.
293
Page 11